Utah statutes.
32A-6-601.   Licensed health care facility exemption.
(1)  Any state licensed health care facility that administers or allows to be
administered any alcoholic product to a patient of the facility when the
alcoholic product is prescribed by a person licensed by the state to write
prescriptions does not violate this title and is not required to hold a
special use permit or license to make or allow the administration of the
alcoholic product.
(2)  This exemption does not apply to  alcoholic beverages purchased by a
health care facility for administration to patients or uses other than stated
in Subsection (1).
